Hawaii statutes.
§346-12 Hearing. An applicant or
recipient, deeming oneself aggrieved, shall be entitled to appeal to the
director in the manner prescribed by department rules and shall be afforded
reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing at which all of the evidence
presented by the parties, to the extent allowed by chapter 91, shall be
considered in a fair and impartial manner. [L 1941, c 296, §1(8); RL 1945,
§4808; RL 1955, §107-8; HRS §346-12; am L 1970, c 105, §5; gen ch 1985; am L
1987, c 339, §4; am L 2004, c 207, §1]

Cross References

Hearings, see chapter 91.

Case Notes

Section together with 45 CFR 2505.10, satisfies due process.
66 H. 489, 666 P.2d 1135 (1983).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next